th: ประเภทที่นั่งยึดล้อ: บอล/เรเดียส; ทรงกรวย/ทรงสอบ; แบน; แม็ก/แชงค์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta naseda pritrdilnega elementa kolesa: Krogla/polmer; Stožčasto/konusno; Ravno; Mag/shank; Drugo
ro-RO: Tipul de scaun al elementelor de fixare ale roții: Sferic / rază; Conic; Plat; Mag / tijă; Altele
fr: Type de siège de fixation de roue: Sphérique / à rayon; Conique; Plat; Cylindrique (Mag); Autre
zh-CN: 轮子紧固件座型: 球面 / 圆弧面; 锥面 / 锥形; 平面; 柱面 / 圆柱形; 其他
da: Sædetype for hjulfastgørelse: Kugle/radius; Konisk/tilspidset; Flad; Mag/skaft; Andet
pl: Typ gniazda mocowania koła: Kulowe; Stożkowe; Płaskie; Z tuleją; Inne
ja: ホイールファスナー座面タイプ: ボール/球面座; テーパー/コニカル座; 平座; マグ/シャンク座; その他
ru: Тип посадки крепежа колеса: Сферическая / радиусная; Конусная; Плоская; Цилиндрическая (Mag/shank); Другое
es: Tipo de asiento de fijación de la rueda: Bola/radio; Cónico/ahusado; Plano; Mag/vástago; Otro
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia kolesa: Guľové / polomerové; Kužeľové / zúžené; Ploché; Mag / shank; Iné
cs: Typ dosedací plochy kolového šroubu/matice: Kulové / rádius; Kónické / kuželové; Ploché; S nákružkem a dříkem (Mag/shank); Jiné
ko: 휠 패스너 시트 유형: 볼/반경형; 원뿔형/테이퍼형; 플랫형; 매그/생크형; 기타
nb: Festetype for hjul: Kule/radius; Konisk/avsmalnende; Flat; Mag/hylse; Annet
sv: Hjulfäste, sätestyp: Kula / radie; Konisk / avsmalnande; Platt; Mag / skaft; Övrigt
vi: Kiểu ghế bắt vít bánh xe: Hình cầu / Bo tròn; Hình nón / Côn; Phẳng; Dạng Mag / Dạng thân trụ; Khác
pt-BR: Fixador de roda tipo de assento: Esférico / raio; Cônico; Plano; Mag / haste; Outro
tr: Bijon oturma tipi: Küre/yarıçap; Konik/sivri; Düz; Mag/şaft; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип легло на крепежа на колелото: Сфера/радиус; Коничен/скосен; Плосък; Mag/стебло; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta sjedišta pričvršćivača kotača: Kuglasto / radijus; Konusno / suženo; Ravno; Mag / drška; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de assento do fixador da roda: Esfera / raio; Cónico / afunilado; Plano; Mag / haste; Outro
hu: Kerékrögzítő fészek típusa: Gömb / rádiusz; Kúpos; Sík; Hengeres nyakú; Egyéb
lt-LT: Ratų tvirtinimo lizdo tipas: Sferinis / spindulinis; Kūginis; Plokščias; „Mag“ / su kakliuku; Kita
it: Tipo di sede del fissaggio della ruota: Sferica / radiale; Conica / affusolata; Piatta; Mag / a gambo; Altro
zh-TW: 輪圈緊固件座類型: 球面/圓弧形; 錐面/斜面; 平面; 直筒加墊片; 其他
de: Art des Radbefestigungssitzes: Kugelbund / Radius; Kegelbund / Konisch; Flachbund; Mag / Schaft; Andere
nl: Wiel bevestiging zitting type: Bol / radius; Conisch / taps toelopend; Plat; Mag / schacht; Overig
en: Wheel fastener seat type: Ball / radius; Conical / tapered; Flat; Mag / shank; Other
el: Τύπος καθίσματος με στερέωση τροχού: Σφαιρική / ακτινωτή; Κωνική / οβάλ; Επίπεδη; Mag / στέλεχος; Άλλο
fi: Pyörän kiinnitysistukan tyyppi: Pallokartio; Suorakartio; Tasainen; Holkki / ohjaava varsi; Muu